District of Columbia statutes.
38-2236

Not funded

Housing Support for Teachers Fund

[Not funded].

Dec. 21, 2007, D.C. Law 17-66, § 7, 54 DCR 10986

Section 10 of D.C. Law 17-66 provided that this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in a Congressional appropriations act.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 17-66 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 17-66, are not in effect.